Massachusetts, session 194th, S872.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 83. The division shall establish a community health center nurse practitioner
residency program for the purposes of recruiting and retaining nurse practitioners at community
health centers in order to increase access to high-quality community-based primary, preventative
and integrated care.
These programs shall:
(i) Provide a 24-month post-graduate residency program, administered by community
health centers, defined as community health centers receiving a grant under 42 USC 254b, for
certified nurse practitioners who have graduated from an accredited school of nursing within the
past three years;
of 2

(ii) Provide nurse practitioners in the program with patient panels under the supervision
and mentorship of a physician or other advanced practice registered nurse at a community health
center; and
(iii) Require nurse practitioners that participate in the 24-month residency program enter
into a contract with the community health center for at least eighteen months of employment.
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to conflict with, replace, or supersede any
licensure requirements or standards for the advanced nursing practice established pursuant to
chapters 94C or 112.
SECTION 2. The division shall make expenditures of no less than $2,500,000 annually to
this program and shall seek federal Medicaid reimbursement for this program as graduate
medical education.
SECTION 3. The division shall promulgate regulations to implement said program,
including program details and grant guidelines as necessary, no later than six months after the
passage of this act.
of 2